District of Columbia statutes.
49-208

Defective accounts; surveying officer to fix responsibility.

Should any officer responsible or accountable for public property, after receiving instructions to transfer the same and close his accounts as aforesaid, fail to close his accounts to the satisfaction of the Commanding General, the heads of the respective staff departments exercising supervision over or control of said property will report the facts to the Adjutant General for the action of the Commanding General of the militia. Upon receiving such a report, the Commanding General may, in his discretion, direct that a surveying officer be appointed to determine and fix the responsibility for the loss or destruction of any public property for which said officer is responsible or accountable and which he has failed to transfer to the officer designated to receive the same.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 633, ch. 146, § 36

History

1981 Ed., § 39-208.
1973 Ed., § 39-508.

Prior Codifications